test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s41_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

#  Verb - flúga: # 
#    flúga+V+Inf: flúga
#    flúga+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: flýgur
#    flúga+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: fleyg
#    flúga+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: flugu
#    flúga+V+Sup: flogið
#
  Verb - flúgva: # 
    flúgva+V+Inf: flúgva
    flúgva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: flýgur
    flúgva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: fleyg
    flúgva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: flugu
    flúgva+V+Sup: flogið
